Idaho, session 2025, S1148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 61-215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-215. SALARIES OF PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSIONERS. Each member of
the public utilities commission shall devote full time to the performance of
his/her duties. Commencing on July 1, 2024 2025, the annual salary of mem-
bers of the public utilities commission shall be one hundred twenty six thou-
sand four hundred twenty-four dollars ($126,424) one hundred twenty-nine
thousand six hundred forty-eight dollars ($129,648) and shall be paid from
sources set by the legislature.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-102. ORGANIZATION -- CHAIRMAN -- COMPENSATION -- QUORUM -- HEAR-
INGS. (1) A member of the state tax commission shall be appointed by the
governor, to serve at his pleasure, as chairman. Each member of the state
tax commission shall devote full time to the performance of duties. Com-
mencing on July 1, 2024 2025, the annual salary for members of the state tax
commission shall be one hundred seventeen thousand three hundred ninety-six
dollars ($117,396) one hundred twenty thousand six hundred twenty dollars
($120,620).
(2) A majority of the state tax commission shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business. The state tax commission may delegate to any
member of the commission or to its employees the power to make investigations
and hold hearings at any place it may deem proper and such other matters as
will facilitate the operations of the commission.
(3) The chairman of the state tax commission shall delegate to each com-
missioner the responsibility for policy management and oversight of one (1)
or more of the taxes collected and activities supervised or administered by
the commission. The state tax commission shall perform the duties imposed
upon it by law and shall adopt all rules by majority decision. In any case
in which the state tax commission sits as an appellate body upon an appeal
from a tax decision from one (1) of the various administrative units subject


to its supervision, the state tax commissioner charged with responsibility
for policy management and oversight of the tax in controversy shall not vote
upon the appeal but may advise the remaining members of the commission on the
technical aspects of the problems before them.
(4) The chairman shall be the chief executive officer and administra-
tive head of the state tax commission and shall be responsible for and, with
the advice and consent of the state tax commission, may assign responsi-
bility for all personnel, budgetary and/or fiscal matters of the state tax
commission. Delegations of authority involving personnel, budgetary and/or
fiscal matters shall be reviewed by request, and sustained by an affirmative
vote, of the majority of the state tax commission.
SECTION 3. That Section 72-503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-503. SALARY. Commencing July 1, 2024 2025, the annual salary of
each member of the industrial commission shall be one hundred twenty-three
thousand one hundred twenty-six dollars ($123,126) one hundred twenty-six
thousand three hundred fifty dollars ($126,350). Industrial commissioner
salaries shall be paid from sources set by the legislature. Each member of
the industrial commission shall devote full time to the performance of his
duties.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.